District of Columbia statutes.
21-2064

Inventory and records.

Within 60 days after appointment, each conservator shall prepare and file with the court a complete inventory of the estate subject to the conservatorship together with an oath or affirmation that the inventory is believed to be complete and accurate as far as information permits. The conservator shall provide a copy to the protected individual unless disappeared, detained by a foreign power, or held hostage by someone other than a foreign power. A copy also shall be provided to any guardian.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2064.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-317 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).